Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-226
Veterans; preference eligibles; preference; required, when.

A preference shall be given to preference eligibles seeking employment with the State of Nebraska or its governmental subdivisions. Such preference includes initial employment, reassignment, a transfer to a new position, and a return to employment with the State of Nebraska or its governmental subdivisions if termination of previous employment was for other than disciplinary reasons.

Laws 1969, c. 751, § 2, p. 2827;

Laws 1997, LB 5, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB639, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB144, § 2.